New York, session 2025-2026, A8333.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The correction law is amended by adding a new section 500-q 2 to read as follows: 3 § 500-q. Prohibition on the detainment of minors with adult detainees. 4 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, rule or regulation to the 5 contrary, no youth under the age of eighteen shall be placed, held, 6 housed or otherwise detained in a secure juvenile detention facility in 7 the city of New York utilized for the detainment of individuals eighteen 8 or older. 9 2. An alleged or convicted juvenile delinquent, as such term is 10 defined in section 301.2 of the family court act, adolescent offender or 11 juvenile offender, as such terms are defined in section 1.20 of the 12 criminal procedure law, greater than eighteen years of age, but less 13 than twenty-two years of age, shall be detained at an older youth 14 detention facility, as in paragraph (d) of subdivision sixteen of 15 section two of this chapter. 16 § 2. Subdivision 16 of section 2 of the correction law is amended by 17 adding a new paragraph (d) to read as follows: 18 (d) Whenever the term "older youth detention facility" is used in this 19 chapter, such term shall be deemed to mean a secure juvenile detention 20 facility operated by the New York city administration for children's 21 services for the detainment of adolescent and juvenile offenders no 22 younger than eighteen years of age and no older than twenty-one years of 23 age. 24 § 3. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 25 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11697-01-5